Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-436
Dissociated partner's liability to other persons.

(1) A partner's dissociation does not of itself discharge the partner's liability for a partnership obligation incurred before dissociation. A dissociated partner is not liable for a partnership obligation incurred after dissociation, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) A partner who dissociates without resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business is liable as a partner to the other party in a transaction entered into by the partnership, or a surviving partnership under sections 67-446 to 67-453, within two years after the partner's dissociation, only if the partner is liable for the obligation under section 67-418 and at the time of entering into the transaction the other party:

(a) Reasonably believed that the dissociated partner was then a partner;

(b) Did not have notice of the partner's dissociation; and

(c) Is not deemed to have had knowledge under subsection (5) of section 67-415 or notice under subsection (3) of section 67-437.

(3) By agreement with the partnership creditor and the partners continuing the business, a dissociated partner may be released from liability for a partnership obligation.

(4) A dissociated partner is released from liability for a partnership obligation if a partnership creditor, with notice of the partner's dissociation but without the partner's consent, agrees to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of a partnership obligation.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 36.